Utah statutes.
78B-3-501.   Definitions.

As used in this part, "therapist" means:

(1)  a psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine under Section 58-67-301, Utah Medical Practice Act or under Section 58-68-301, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;

(2)  a psychologist licensed to practice psychology under Section 58-61-301;

(3)  a marriage and family therapist licensed to practice marriage and family therapy under Section 58-60-304;

(4)  a social worker licensed to practice social work under Section 58-60-204;

(5)  a psychiatric and mental health nurse specialist licensed to practice advanced psychiatric nursing under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act; and

(6)  a clinical mental health counselor licensed to practice professional counseling under Title 58, Chapter 60, Part 4, Clinical Mental Health Counselor Licensing Act.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2012 General Session

